California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 40.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 40. Bulky Flavored Fromage Frais or Bulky Flavored Soft Fresh Cheese [38891. - 38892.]

38891.

Bulky flavored fromage frais or bulky flavored soft fresh cheese is fromage frais or soft fresh cheese that contains clean, mature, sound fruit or its equivalent in other forms, or other bulky flavoring ingredients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38892.

When bulky flavor is added to fromage frais or soft fresh cheese, the name of the bulky flavor shall accompany the name of the product on the principal panel or panels of the label. Bulky flavored fromage frais or bulky flavored soft fresh cheese in its composition and labeling shall otherwise comply with all the requirements of Article 39 (commencing with Section 38885).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 42.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 41. Lactose Reduced Dairy Products [38895.1. - 38895.2.]

38895.1.

Safe and suitable enzymes, as approved by the director, may be added to dairy products for the purpose of conversion of lactose to glucose or galactose. Any added enzyme shall appear in the ingredient list of the product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 610, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

38895.2.

“Lactose reduced” may be included in the nomenclature of the product if there has been conversion of sufficient amounts of lactose to glucose or galactose so that the remaining lactose is less than 30 percent of the original lactose of the dairy product. Lactose reduced dairy products shall meet all other compositional standards for the products except that the minimum solids-not-fat content for reduced-fat, lowfat, or light (lite) milk, and flavored reduced-fat, lowfat, or light (lite) milk, labeled as “lactose reduced” shall be 8.7 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 43.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Products Resembling Milk Products [38901. - 38992.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [38901. - 38908.]

38901.

The production and distribution of products resembling milk products, is hereby declared to be a business affected with a public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38902.

The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(a) There is an increasing advent into the marketplace of food products which in appearance, taste and other physical characteristics resemble milk products, which are frequently mistaken by consumers for milk and milk products, which are used for the same or similar purposes as milk and milk products, which are frequently manufactured, transported and sold in the same places as milk and milk products, which are frequently packaged in the same types, sizes and shapes of containers as milk and milk products, which are suitable media for the growth and multiplication of micro-organisms; but which food products contain fats and oils other than milk fat in combination with milk products or contain no milk products.

(b) It is necessary in order to prevent and avoid false, misleading and deceptive marketing of such products resembling milk products, and in order to prevent deception and confusion among consumers, and in order to protect public health, that this chapter be enacted, and that the director from time to time promulgate regulations governing the labeling, identification and sanitary production of all such products.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38903.

This chapter does not apply to:

(a) Margarine, dairy spread, or spread subject to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 39351).

(b) A distinctive proprietary food compound which complies with all of the following requirements:

(1) Not readily mistaken in taste for milk, or for evaporated, skim, condensed, or dried milk.

(2) Prepared and designed for feeding infants and young children.

(3) Sold exclusively by druggists, orphanages, child welfare associations, hospitals, and similar institutions or for shipment outside of this state.

(c) Imitation ice cream and ice milk subject to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 39151).

(d) Any product resembling a milk product which resembling product is subjected to a temperature high enough to sterilize the product and is packaged in an hermetically sealed container.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

38903.5.

Imitation cheese or substitute for cheese are subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 341.)
-------------------------------------------

38903.6.

Nondairy frozen dessert is subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------

38904.

Except as provided in this section, no products resembling milk products shall be used in any of the charitable or penal institutions that receive assistance from the state. If the state is informed in writing that government holdings of milk or milk products cannot be purchased or acquired by the state, the Department of General Services may purchase for use in state institutions such products if requested to do so by the director of the department which has control of any state institutions for which such product is intended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38905.

It is unlawful for a restaurant or any other place where food is served to the public for consumption on the premises to misrepresent products resembling milk products as milk products.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 4.2.)
-------------------------------------------

38906.

If a provision of this chapter and a provision of the Health and Safety Code are applicable to the same person and subject matter, the provisions of this chapter shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38907.

If any article, section, subdivision, sentence or clause of any provision of this chapter is for any reason adjudged unconstitutional or unenforceable, such decision does not affect the validity of the remaining provisions of this chapter. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have enacted all provisions of this chapter irrespective of the fact that one or more of such provisions is adjudged unconstitutional or unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38908.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed as necessitating any alterations or deviations in the normal and traditional methods of manufacturing, distributing, and selling products resembling milk products, except insofar as such methods specifically violate provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [38911. - 38915.]

38911.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38912.

“Products resembling milk products” means any food product for human consumption, except those referred to in Section 38903, which has the appearance, taste, smell, texture or color of a milk product and which, taken as a whole, bears resemblance to a milk product, could be mistaken for a milk product, or could be used as a substitute for a milk product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

38914.

“Imitation milk product” means a product resembling a milk product which contains oils, fats, or other ingredients, other than milk or milk products, in combination with milk or milk products. An imitation milk product may be referred to as a “filled product,” or by such other name or names as may be established from time to time by the director by regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

38915.

“Nondairy product” means a product resembling a milk product, but which nondairy product contains no milk or milk solids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Standards [38924. - 38926.5.]

38924.

The director shall adopt regulations providing for the healthfulness and standard of purity of products resembling milk products. The regulations shall be those reasonably necessary to ensure that the products are safe for human consumption under the circumstances under which they are likely to be offered for sale and consumed. The standards of purity, including bacterial standards, shall not be less than those of the milk products imitated or substituted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

38925.

When the use of market milk or any derivative or component of market milk is required in any milk product, any fluid milk, fluid skim milk, fluid cream, milk fat or milk solids used in an imitation milk product imitating the milk product shall be market milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

38926.

Nondairy frozen dessert shall comply with the following standards:

(a) The product shall contain not less than one-half of 1 percent of edible oil or fat other than milk fat. 

(b) The product shall contain 1.3 pounds of food solids per gallon at the time of sale to the consumer. 

(c) The product may contain harmless edible stabilizers and emulsifiers as specified in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. 

(d) The product may contain nutritive carbohydrate sweeteners. 

(e) The product may contain fruit or fruit juices, nut meats, harmless flavoring, and harmless coloring. 

(f) The product shall not contain more than 75,000 bacteria or 10 coliform bacteria per gram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 840, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

38926.5.

Nondairy frozen dessert mix is a product in a final, dry, or concentrated form used in the manufacture of nondairy frozen dessert. It shall comply with all the requirements of nondairy frozen dessert. It shall have been pasteurized or otherwise subjected to a process that has been proven, to the satisfaction of the director, to be equally effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Plant Licensing [38931. - 38937.]

38931.

It is unlawful to engage in the manufacture of products resembling milk products, unless a license for the then current calendar year for each separate plant or place used for such business is issued by the director pursuant to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38932.

Applications for a license shall be in the form which shall be prescribed by the director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38933.

The application shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars ($100). The fee shall be prorated on a monthly basis for any licensee that commences operations after the first quarter in any calendar year whether or not such plant was licensed during the preceding calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 634.)
-------------------------------------------

38934.

The director shall issue to each applicant that satisfies the requirements of this chapter a license which entitles the applicant to manufacture, sell, or distribute products resembling milk products for the then current calendar year for which the license is issued, unless the license is sooner revoked or suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38935.

The license shall expire at the end of each calendar year, but shall remain in force during the month of January of the next succeeding year or such part of the month as may be necessary for the renewal of the license by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38936.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, give away, deliver, or to knowingly purchase or receive any product resembling milk products which has been produced in a plant that is in an insanitary condition, or that is handled by any carrier or any store or depot that is in an insanitary condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968.   Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38937.

Grounds for revocation or suspension of such license shall be the manufacture of products resembling milk products under unhealthful or insanitary conditions or which violate the provisions of Section 38924 or 38925.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Product Registration [38941. - 38946.]

38941.

Any person engaged in the manufacture of products resembling milk products, shall register the products with the department as provided by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38942.

Application for a registered product shall be in the form which shall be prescribed by the department and shall include the ingredients of the product, and the proposed label or labels for the product. The director shall grant such application if he determines that the product will comply or has complied with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38943.

The application shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25). The information required by Section 38942 shall be kept current and amended whenever any change is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

38943.5.

Each registration which has been approved expires on December 31st of the second year after it was approved and may be renewed for two years by payment of a renewal fee of ten dollars ($10). The renewal shall be made on forms which are supplied by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38944.

No product resembling milk products shall be sold unless it has an active registration on file with the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38944.5.

If renewal of any registration is not made within 60 days after expiration of the registration, the registration becomes null and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

38945.

In addition to any other penalty, the department may revoke or suspend the registration of any product resembling milk products for any violation of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

38946.

All product registration made pursuant to this article shall be confidential. No information contained in the application for any such registration, or in the registration, shall be divulged by the director except if necessary for the proper determination of any court proceedings or hearing before the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Labels [38951. - 38956.]

38951.

Any person or association or corporation engaged in the manufacture, sale, or distribution of products resembling milk products shall label such products in accordance with the provisions of this article and with regulations which shall be adopted by the director. The labels may be submitted to the director for approval.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38952.

Each container which contains a product resembling a milk product, shall be labeled with the name and address of the manufacturer or distributor, and in the event the address is not the address of the manufacturer or final packaging plant, the label shall include the national uniform federal information processing standards state code number to be immediately followed by a hyphen and the plant number assigned by the appropriate state regulatory agency. The list of ingredients of any product resembling a milk product shall be immediately preceded by the product name, such as “Imitation ____,” “Nondairy Product,” “Filled Product,” or any other applicable term the director has established for the products by regulation. In addition, the director may, by regulation, require any other information to be included on the label which the director determines to be in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

38952.5.

Any product labeled as a “nondairy product” and containing one or more ingredients derived from milk shall clearly indicate upon such label, in a manner established by the director through regulation, which ingredients are milk derivatives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 473.)
-------------------------------------------

38953.

An imitation milk product, the composition and physical characteristics of which closely resemble those of a milk product or a specified variety of a milk product may be labeled “imitation,” followed by the name of the milk product imitated; for example, “imitation milk,” “imitation coffee cream,” “imitation cheddar cheese.”

An imitation milk product, the composition and physical characteristics of which do not closely resemble those of a milk product or a defined variety of a milk product shall be labeled as “imitation” or “filled” or by any other term approved by the director, followed by a term which generally describes that category of milk product; for example, “imitation milk product,” “imitation cream product,” “imitation cheese product.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

38954.

Labels or products resembling milk products may contain references and comparisons of the products with milk products as long as such statements are reasonable, relevant, truthful, complete, and not deceptive or misleading. The director may require satisfactory proof of the compliance of any statement with the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38955.

On the labels of imitation milk products the use of pictures and symbols depicting dairy or agricultural activities, or associating the product with such activities, and use of dairy or agricultural terms or words, or derivations or cognates thereof, shall be subject to restriction or prohibition by the director by regulation. The basis for such regulations shall be the degree to which such symbols or words make or fail to make a significant contribution to a truthful and complete representation of the product, or appear to be likely to be deceptive and misleading to the purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38956.

Nondairy product containers and labels shall not contain any combination of words, symbols, marks, designs, or representations commonly used or associated with the sale, advertising, or distribution of milk products. The labels shall not contain statements regarding milk products except those permitted by Section 38954 and any necessary factual statement regarding any ingredient milk products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Advertising and Display [38971. - 38972.]

38971.

No product resembling a milk product shall be advertised, displayed for sale, or sold in any manner or under any circumstances or conditions that is likely to mislead, deceive, or confuse consumers into believing such products are milk products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38972.

The director may adopt regulations to enforce the provisions of this article. In adopting the regulations, the director shall consider and follow, insofar as practical, the provisions of Sections 38952, 38954, 38955, and 38956, as well as any other relevant considerations. In addition the director may distinguish between different products or types of products on the basis of the nature of the product, its labeling, the manner in which it is customarily presented or is likely to be presented to the consumer, and any other relevant factors, if he or she determines the differentiation is warranted and in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Administration [38981. - 38987.]

38981.

The director shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38982.

The director may adopt any regulations necessary for the implementation and adequate enforcement and administration of the provisions of this chapter and that he determines are necessary to protect the public health and to prevent deception and confusion among consumers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38983.

The regulations shall be adopted after a public hearing in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

38985.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, the director shall by regulation waive any of the provisions of this chapter as they apply to products resembling milk products manufactured for sale and distribution exclusively outside of this state, provided that the regulations contain provisions ensuring that the products will not be made available or sold to consumers in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

38986.

If the director determines that fees established to enforce and administer this chapter exceed the cost of enforcing and administering this chapter, he or she may by regulation reduce the fees accordingly. If he or she determines that the fees are insufficient to defray the costs, he or she may use funds for the administration and enforcement of this chapter which are collected from producers and distributors pursuant to Article 14 (commencing with Section 62211) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 21 and which have been appropriated from the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

38987.

Any moneys which are received by the director or the department pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Agriculture Fund to be expended as provided by the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Civil Remedies and Penalties [38991. - 38992.]

38991.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation, or the threatened violation, of any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted under this chapter in the superior court in the county in which the violation occurs or is about to occur. There may be enjoined in one proceeding any number of defendants alleged to be violating the same provisions or regulations, although their properties, interests, residences, or places of business may be in several counties and the violations separate and distinct. Any proceeding which is brought pursuant to this section shall be governed in all other respects by the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

38992.

Any person that violates any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted under this chapter, is liable civilly in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) for each and every violation. The penalty is to be recovered by the director in any court of competent jurisdiction. Any sum which is recovered under this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 787, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Imitation Ice Cream and Ice Milk [39151. - 39214.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [39151. - 39153.]

39151.

The ingredients, except fruits, nuts, and flavors, which are used in the manufacture of imitation ice cream or imitation ice milk, shall be pasteurized.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

39152.

Imitation ice cream and imitation ice milk shall otherwise be manufactured, advertised, and sold pursuant to regulations which are adopted by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

39153.

It is unlawful for any person to sell imitation ice cream or imitation ice milk in bulk for purpose of resale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Imitation Ice Cream and Ice Milk Standards [39181. - 39184.]

39181.

Imitation ice cream and imitation ice milk are substances, mixtures, or compounds which are made in the imitation of, or which have the appearance of, ice cream or ice milk, and which contain any edible oil or fat, except milk fat, or which contain solids other than milk solids not fat except stabilizer, fruits, nuts, chocolate syrup, or sweetening.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

39182.

Imitation ice cream shall contain not less than 10 percent of edible oil or fat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

39183.

Imitation ice milk shall contain not less than 2 percent of edible oil or fat, and harmless edible stabilizer as specified in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 840, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

39184.

Imitation ice cream or imitation ice milk, at the time of sale by the manufacturer or retailer, shall not contain more than 75,000 bacteria per gram. Imitation ice cream and imitation ice milk shall otherwise conform to the composition and weight requirements which are specified in regulations of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Labels and Signs [39211. - 39214.]

39211.

Every container of imitation ice cream or imitation ice milk shall be conspicuously so labeled, and every place where imitation ice cream or imitation ice milk is sold, shall display a conspicuous, legible sign which contains the words “imitation ice cream sold here” or “imitation ice milk sold here”, as the case may be, in plain, block letters that are not less than six inches high. The sign display requirements of this section shall not apply to any place, except any vending machine whether mobile or otherwise, where imitation ice cream or imitation ice milk is sold in properly labeled consumer packages or containers for off-premises consumption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

39212.

If a trade name is used on any vehicle which conveys, or any place where imitation ice cream or imitation ice milk is sold, the words “imitation ice cream” or “imitation ice milk”, shall be the same size as the largest letters used in the trade name and as conspicuously placed. In no case shall the letters in the words “imitation ice cream” or “imitation ice milk” be less than six inches high.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

39213.

A person shall not use the name “creamy,” “creamery,” or “dairy,” or the representation of a cow or any breed of dairy cattle, or any combination of such words, symbols, marks, designs, or representations commonly used in the sale, advertising, or distribution of ice cream.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

39214.

Milk shakes, malted milks, or malts, as such terms are commonly used in the restaurant, confectionary, or soft drink trade shall not be made from imitation ice cream or imitation ice milk or served to any customer for consumption upon the premises where they are made unless there is displayed upon such premises and visible to all customers a sign, which, as the case may require, shall read: “Imitation ice cream used in the milk drinks served here” or “Imitation ice milk used in the milk drinks served here.”

Each such sign shall be printed in plain block letters not less than six inches high.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Margarine, Dairy Spread, and Spread [39351. - 39521.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [39351. - 39353.]

39351.

Except as otherwise provided, the provisions of this code which relate to margarine, dairy spread, or spread are likewise applicable to colored margarine, colored dairy spread, or colored spread.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

39352.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly to ship, or for any carrier for hire knowingly to receive for shipment, any margarine, dairy spread, or spread unless it is labeled in conformity with this chapter and shipped and receipted for in its true name, or unless it is in transit between foreign states.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

39353.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly to possess or have under his or her control any margarine, dairy spread, or spread, except for actual consumption by himself or herself or his or her family, unless it is labeled in conformity with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Labeling of Shipping Containers [39381. - 39382.]

39381.

Each person that manufactures any margarine, dairy spread, or spread shall comply with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

39382.

There shall be printed, stamped, or stenciled in a clear and durable manner upon one side of each tub, firkin, box, or other outer package in which margarine, dairy spread, or spread is removed from the place where it is produced or put up, as distinguished from the package in which it is to be put up for sale or sold at retail, all of the following:

(a) The words “oleomargarine,” “margarine,” “dairy spread,” or “spread,” as the case may be, in plain roman letters of not less than 36-point type.

(b) A statement, which is printed in plain roman type, of a size not smaller than pica, which states the name and address of the manufacturer or of the distributor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Labeling of Retail Packages [39411. - 39411.]

39411.

It is unlawful for any person to sell any margarine, dairy spread, or spread, unless there is printed upon the label of each and every package, or other container in which the margarine, dairy spread, or spread is put up for sale or sold at retail all of the following:

(a) The words “oleomargarine,” “margarine,” “dairy spread,” or “spread,” as the case may be, in letters which are at least as large as any other type or lettering on the label. The word “oleomargarine,” “margarine,” “dairy spread,” or “spread” shall be of a color in strong contrast to the color of the container.

(b) The name and address of the manufacturer or distributor.

(c) The net weight of the contents.

(d) A full and accurate statement of all the ingredients which are contained in the substance in the package.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Misrepresentation [39431. - 39432.]

39431.

A person shall not sell or take orders for the future delivery of any margarine, dairy spread, or spread under the name of butter, or under the pretense that the substance is butter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

39432.

A person shall not, in connection or association with the sale or advertisement of any margarine, dairy spread, or spread represent or suggest by any means whatsoever that the substance is a dairy product. Nothing contained in this section shall, however, prevent an accurate and full statement of all of the ingredients which are contained in such substance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Margarine [39471. - 39471.]

39471.

Margarine (oleomargarine) is a substitute for butter which contains not less than 80 percent edible oils or fat and otherwise conforms to Part 166 (commencing with Section 166.40) of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Colored Margarine, Dairy Spread, or Spread [39491. - 39491.]

39491.

Colored margarine, dairy spread, or spread is margarine, dairy spread, or spread which has a tint or shade that contains more than 1.6 degrees of yellow, or of yellow and red collectively, but with an excess of yellow over red, measured in terms of the Lovibond tintometer scale or its equivalent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Dairy Spread [39501. - 39502.]

39501.

Dairy spread is a substitute for butter which is made from a blend of milkfat, cultured buttermilk, milk solids-not-fat, and edible oil or fat, other than milk fat. Dairy spread may contain one or more of the following optional ingredients: salt, harmless flavor and color, any safe and suitable stabilizers and emulsifiers, and vitamins.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

39502.

Dairy spread shall contain a minimum of 40 percent fat and a minimum of 15 percent milk solids-not-fat; (60 percent of the blended fat ingredients shall be of milk fat origin) and may contain not more than 0.01 percent potassium sorbate to retard spoilage. Dairy spread shall be pasteurized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Spread [39521. - 39521.]

39521.

Spread is a substitute for butter consisting of mixtures of compounds which may include milk solids-not-fat and edible oils and fats that is made in imitation or semblance of butter and does not meet the definition for margarine or dairy spread.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. UHT Milk Products [39701. - 39842.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [39701. - 39702.]

39701.

“UHT” when used to describe a dairy product or a product resembling a milk product means that the product has been hermetically sealed in a container and so thermally processed in conformance with Section 113 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the provisions of the Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance as to render the product free of microorganisms capable of reproducing in the product under normal nonrefrigeration conditions of storage and distribution. The product shall be free of viable microorganisms, including spores, of public health significance. UHT products, as defined in this chapter, shall meet the definition for aseptically processed milk and milk products in the Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

39702.

(a) All products defined in this chapter shall be labeled in accordance with the applicable general labeling requirements of the Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance for aseptically processed milk and milk products.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all products defined in this chapter shall conform to the labeling requirements for market milk and applicable labeling provisions of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. UHT Milk and Cream [39711. - 39715.]

39711.

UHT milk and UHT cream is market milk or market cream processed and packaged pursuant to Section 39701. A harmless edible stabilizer as specified in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations may be added to UHT milk or UHT cream.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 840, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

39712.

UHT milk or UHT cream shall be made from market milk or market cream which meets all the requirements of this division for the respective class or grade of milk and cream which is used. However, the milk or cream need not be cooled if it has been demonstrated to the satisfaction of the director that this cooling is not required for the proper processing of the product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

39713.

UHT milk shall contain not less than 3.25 percent milk fat and not less than 8.25 percent milk solids-not-fat.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

39714.

UHT cream shall contain not less than 18 percent milk fat.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

39715.

UHT milk or UHT cream which has been altered in composition to conform to special nutritional requirements or special dietary purposes shall include “modified” in its name. If the alteration is due to the use of additives, the additives shall be approved by the director and shall be stated on the label.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. UHT Reduced-Fat Milk and UHT Lowfat or Light Milk [39721. - 39723.]

39721.

UHT lowfat milk is market milk, evaporated market milk, condensed market milk, or dried market milk, or any combination thereof, processed and packaged pursuant to Section 39701. It may contain harmless edible stabilizers as specified in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. UHT lowfat milk shall be homogenized.
